Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Article 4. Breaking Open Pound; Escapes and Rescues

§ 3481.
Breaking open pound; unlawful release.

A person who breaks open a pound, or directly or indirectly releases an animal impounded, without authority so to do, shall be fined $25.00 and shall be liable to the person impounding for the damages occasioned thereby.

§ 3482.
Escapes and rescues.

If an animal escapes, or is unlawfully rescued from a pound, such animal may, within five days thereafter, be retaken wherever found and again impounded by the keeper of the pound, or by the person impounding it, and the animal shall be held for the payment of the fees and charges, as in this chapter provided.
In case the animal was rescued with the knowledge and assent of the owner or keeper, it shall be held for the payment of the reasonable expense and trouble that accrues in retaking the same, to be paid to the poundkeeper, like other charges and expenses.

§ 3483.
Hindering retaking.

A person who hinders or impedes a poundkeeper or impounder in retaking an animal shall be fined $10.00 and shall pay the damages to the person injured.

§ 3484.
Taking animal from or impeding impounder.

A person who rescues an animal from the custody of a person driving or about to drive it to pound, or resists him or her in so doing, shall be fined $10.00 and shall pay the damages to the person injured.

§ 3485.
Limitation of prosecution.

Prosecutions under the provisions of this subchapter shall be commenced within one year after the commission of the offense, and not after.